District of Columbia statutes.
16-3907

Judgment; stay; installment payments; enforcement.

When judgment is to be rendered in an action pursuant to this chapter and the party against whom it is to be entered requests it, the judge shall inquire fully into his earnings and financial status and may stay the entry of judgment, and stay execution, except in cases involving wage claims, and order partial payments in such amounts, over such periods, and upon such terms, as seems just in the circumstances and as will assure a definite and steady reduction of the judgment until it is finally and completely satisfied. Upon a showing that the party has failed to meet an installment payment without just excuse, the stay of execution shall be vacated. When a stay of execution has not been ordered or when a stay of execution has been vacated as provided by this section, the party in whose favor the judgment has been entered may avail himself of all remedies otherwise available in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia for the enforcement of the judgment.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 611, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 564, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(p)(6)
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 10(pp), 45 DCR 745
1973 Ed., § 16-3907.
1981 Ed., § 16-3907.